Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.446

Suicide-safer homes project—Suicide-safer homes project account.

(1) The suicide-safer homes project is created within the department of health for the purpose of accepting private funds for use by the suicide-safer homes task force created in *RCW 43.70.445 in developing and providing suicide education and prevention materials, training, and outreach programs to help create suicide-safer homes. The secretary may accept gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source for deposit in the suicide-safer homes project account created in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The suicide-safer homes project account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the suicide-safer homes project account and all receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private sources to support the activities of the suicide-safer homes project. Only the secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account to fund projects identified and prioritized by the suicide-safer homes task force. Funds deposited in the suicide-safer homes project account may be used for the development and production of suicide prevention materials and training programs, for providing financial incentives to encourage firearms dealers and others to participate in suicide prevention training, and to implement pilot programs involving community outreach on creating suicide-safer homes.

(3) The suicide-safer homes project account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2017 c 262 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.70.445 expired July 1, 2021.

Findings—Intent—2017 c 262: See note following RCW 43.70.442.